Utah statutes.
4-31-111.   Imported animals -- Health certificate.

Except as provided by rule made by the department, a person may not import an animal into this state unless the animal is accompanied by a health certificate that:

(1)  meets the requirements of department rules; and

(2)  is issued by a federally accredited veterinarian.

